Massachusetts, session 194th, H3092.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8a of chapter 44B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting the following after the words “Chapter 188” in line xx: or to the filing of
any subordinate mortgage extended by any public agency or quasi-public agency, including but
not limited to a Commonwealth municipality or the Massachusetts Housing Partnership.
SECTION 2. Section 8b of chapter 44B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting the following after the words “Chapter 188” in line xx: or to the filing of
any subordinate mortgage extended by any public agency or quasi-public agency, including but
not limited to a Commonwealth municipality or the Massachusetts Housing Partnership.
of 1